Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 4. Organization, Incorporation, Certification, Capital Structure, and General Powers, Limitations, and Requirements.

Sec. 06.05.300.
General corporate powers. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.301.
Applicability of corporations code.

Except for national banks with a principal place of business in the state, and interstate state banks and international banks with a certificate of authority under AS

06.05.555

, a corporation may not engage in the banking business unless the corporation is organized under AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) and this title.

The provisions of AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) apply to state banks, except those provisions inconsistent with this chapter. The provisions inconsistent with this chapter include AS

10.06.010

(4) — (8),

10.06.105(a)

and (d),

10.06.325

,

10.06.356

,

10.06.358

—

10.06.360

,

10.06.370

,

10.06.385

—

10.06.388

,

10.06.420(i)

,

10.06.430

,

10.06.453

,

10.06.460(b)

,

10.06.485

,

10.06.522

—

10.06.868

,

10.06.915

,

10.06.960

, and

10.06.990

(30) and (38).

History.

(§ 49 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1999; am § 19 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (b) of this section, “ AS

10.06.990

(31) [now (30)] and (37)” was substituted for “ AS

10.06.990

(30) and (36)” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of paragraphs in
AS 10.06.990.

In 2021, in (b) of this section, “ AS

10.06.990

(30) and (38)” was substituted for “ AS

10.06.990

(30) and (37)” to reflect the 2021 renumbering of paragraphs in
AS 10.06.990.

Sec. 06.05.305.
Capital structure.

A corporation may not commence and operate a banking business in the state in a community with a population of 35,000 or more unless the corporation has paid-in capital in an amount acceptable to the department, but not less than $2,000,000, and paid-in surplus equal to 20 percent of paid-in capital. A corporation may not commence and operate as a bank in the state in a community with a population less than 35,000 unless the corporation has paid-in capital in an amount acceptable to the department, but not less than $1,000,000, and paid-in surplus equal to 20 percent of paid-in capital. A bank may not operate any branches unless it has an aggregate paid-in capital and paid-in surplus in amounts acceptable to the department.

The capital of a state bank may not be reduced to an amount less than is required by the department for capital under (a) of this section. A reduction of capital or the liability of the shareholders is not valid until it is approved by the department.

If a state bank fails to maintain its total capital accounts and loan loss reserves in an amount equal to the assets classified as substandard by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or by the state in the bank’s latest report of examination, the department shall consider the failure as endangering the safety of depositors and may direct the bank’s directors to increase the capital accounts in an amount sufficient to cover substandard assets.

History.

(§ 3.202 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 11 ch 230 SLA 1968; am §§ 6, 7 ch 63 SLA 1969; am § 21 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 50 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 49-52.

Sec. 06.05.307.
Capital notes or debentures.

A bank organized under the laws of this state may, with the approval of stockholders owning two-thirds of the stock of the bank entitled to vote or without this approval if authorized by its articles of incorporation, issue convertible or nonconvertible capital notes or debentures with the written consent of the department. The principal amount of notes and debentures outstanding at any time may not exceed 33 1/3 percent of the capital stock and surplus fund of the bank at the date of issue. The rate and term are subject to the approval of the department but in no event may the term be more than 20 years after the date of issue.

A bank may not retire capital notes or debentures if the retirement creates an impairment of its capital. Capital notes and debentures are subordinated in right of payment in the event of insolvency or liquidation of the bank to the prior payment of all deposits and all claims of other creditors except the holders of securities on a parity with the capital notes and debentures and the holders of securities expressly subordinated to the capital notes and debentures.

Bank assets may not be pledged to secure capital notes and debentures, but the bank may, for the security and the protection of the holders of the capital notes and debentures, agree through its board of directors to restrict the payment of dividends.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 8 ch 63 SLA 1969; am § 22 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.310.
Correction of impairment of capital.

If the department determines that the order is necessary for the protection of depositors, the department may issue an order under AS

06.01.030

to require a state bank to increase its capital accounts or to reduce its deposits. In making a decision whether to issue an order under this section, the department shall consider the

quality of management;

quality and liquidity of assets;

history of earnings and retention of earnings;

quality and character of ownership;

potential volatility of deposit structure;

quality and cost of bank operations; and

capacity to meet present and future needs of the area served, considering the bank’s competition.

History.

(§ 3.203 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 23 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 51 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 11-15, 221, 222, 629, 640.

Sec. 06.05.315.
Double stockholder liability. [Repealed, § 54 ch 169 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 06.05.320.
Bank purchases of own shares.

Except in accordance with written approval of the department, a bank may not purchase its own capital stock.

History.

(§ 3.205 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 52 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking § 245.

Sec. 06.05.325.
Bank stock as personalty. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.327.
Change in outstanding voting shares.

Before a change may occur in the outstanding voting shares of a state bank that will result in a change in the control of the bank, or before any sales or transfers by or to a person, corporation or other legal entity of the aggregate of 10 percent or more of the voting shares of a state bank may be made, the transaction must be approved by the department.

History.

(§ 12 ch 230 SLA 1968; am § 53 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.330.
Incorporators. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.335.
Notice of intention to incorporate, establish branch bank or relocate. [Repealed, § 54 ch 169 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 06.05.340.
Certain remuneration prohibited.

A bank may not pay directly or indirectly a fee, commission, or bonus of any kind for its promotion and organization or for securing a subscription to the original capital or to any increase in capital. However, this section does not prohibit the payment of reasonable compensation for legal, accounting, and econometric services, or payments to a securities broker-dealer registered under AS 45.56 for services that have been performed in connection with the sale of bank securities.

History.

(§ 3.209 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 1966; am § 24 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the second sentence, substituted “AS 45.56” for “AS 45.55” following “securities broker-dealer registered under”.

Sec. 06.05.342.
Subscriptions for shares.

Subscription agreements and accompanying prospectuses or offering circulars, whether for a proposed state bank or for an increase in capital of an existing state bank, shall be submitted to the department for approval before their use. The department shall determine whether the subscription agreements or offering circulars provide full and accurate disclosure of the material terms of the offering. The department may order the incorporators not to accept any stock subscriptions or to cease accepting subscriptions if the department determines that the incorporators are not acting lawfully or in good faith.

In the case of a proposed state bank, the incorporators shall submit a list of subscribers, providing the name, residence address, and occupation of each subscriber and the number of shares for which the person has subscribed.

History.

(§ 25 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 54 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.344.
Application for approval of state bank.

Before the department issues a certificate of incorporation under AS

10.06.910

for a state bank, the incorporators of a proposed state bank shall obtain the approval of the department. In applying for the approval, the incorporators shall file with the department

an application in the form and containing the information the department requires, including

for each incorporator and proposed director, and for each preincorporation subscriber of more than five percent of the capital stock, any past and present connection with a bank other than as a customer on terms generally available to the public;

the name, residence, and occupation of each preincorporation subscriber and the number of shares subscribed for by the subscriber;

the address of the proposed place of business of the bank or, if an address is not available, a legal description of the proposed place of business; and

the proposed articles of incorporation; and

all applicable fees, payable to the department, for the filing.

Investigation expenses incurred by the department in processing an application for approval of a proposed bank shall be charged to and paid by the applicant under AS

06.01.010

. When submitting the application to the department, the applicant shall pay to the department $2,000 in partial payment of the investigation expenses incurred by the department. If the investigation expenses incurred by the department are less than $2,000, the department shall promptly refund the excess to the applicant.

The department shall notify the incorporators of its decision whether to accept an application for a proposed state bank. If the application and accompanying documents required by (a) of this section do not conform to the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter, the department shall return the documents with an explanation of the defects. If the department does not act within 30 days of receipt of the application, the application is considered to be accepted. Acceptance of the application does not constitute approval.

The incorporators shall publish notice of the department’s acceptance of the application for a proposed state bank and acceptance of the articles of incorporation once each week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the community proposed as the bank’s principal place of business. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the community, the notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation near the community. The first publication of the notice must appear within 15 days after the application and articles of incorporation have been accepted by the department. The notice must state

the name of the proposed state bank;

that the proposed bank is to be incorporated under this chapter and AS 10.06;

the purpose of the proposed bank; and

the names and addresses of the incorporators and the initial board of directors as the names and addresses appear in the articles of incorporation.

To prove that the publication required by (d) of this section was made, the incorporators shall file with the department an affidavit of the publisher of the newspaper in which the notice was published.

Upon acceptance of an application for approval of a proposed state bank, the department shall conduct an investigation to determine whether

the convenience and needs of the public will be served by the bank;

the population density and economic characteristics of the area primarily to be served by the bank afford reasonable promise of adequate support for the bank;

the character and fitness of the incorporators and the members of the initial board of directors command the confidence of the community and warrant the belief that the business of the bank will be honestly and efficiently conducted;

the proposed capital structure of the bank meets the requirements set by the department under AS

06.05.305

;

the bank will have personnel with adequate knowledge and experience to conduct its business and officers of good character and financial responsibility;

the addition of the bank is not detrimental to a sound and competitive banking system; and

other relevant facts and circumstances exist that bear on the bank and its relation to the community.

The department shall approve or deny an application within six months after the application for approval has been accepted. The time may be extended by up to six additional months when the department determines that an extension is warranted by exceptional circumstances. Within 60 days after the second publication of the notice required by (d) of this section, a person opposing approval of the application may file written objections with the department. When it approves or denies the application, the department shall notify the incorporators and a person who requested in writing to be notified, and, if the application is denied, the department shall state the reasons for its decision and return all copies of the articles of incorporation.

If the department approves the application, the department shall endorse the approval on the articles of incorporation, file the articles of incorporation, and issue a certificate of incorporation under AS

10.06.910

.

History.

(§ 55 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of banks, see 3 AAC 2, art. 3.

Sec. 06.05.345.
Articles of incorporation.

In addition to those items required under AS

10.06.208

, the articles of incorporation of a state bank must specify

the judicial district in which the bank is to be located and the community where the bank is to conduct its principal place of business;

the amount of its capital stock, which shall be divided into shares having a par value of not less than $1 each;

that there will be at least five but no more than 25 directors; and

the period for which the bank is organized, if limited.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

A bank may amend its articles of incorporation in a manner consistent with its articles and bylaws, AS 10.06, and this chapter by a vote of its shareholders representing at least a majority of the capital at a regular meeting or at a special meeting called for the purpose.

History.

(§ 3.210 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 2 SLA 1964; am § 13 ch 230 SLA 1968; am § 11 ch 157 SLA 1970; am § 26 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 56, 57, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of banks, see 3 AAC 2, art. 3.

For liquidation, dissolution, and reorganization, see 3 AAC 2, art. 4.

Sec. 06.05.350.
Certificate of authority.

At any time after receiving a certificate of incorporation, a bank may apply to the department for a certificate of authority to engage in the banking business. Before receiving a certificate of authority, a bank may not perform an act other than to perfect its organization, obtain and equip a place of business, obtain subscriptions and payment for its shares, and otherwise prepare to do business. If a bank violates this subsection by transacting business before it receives a certificate of authority, the directors and officers who wilfully authorized or participated in the action are personally, jointly, and severally liable for the debts and liabilities of the bank incurred before the certificate of authority is issued.

The department shall issue a certificate of authority to engage in the banking business to a proposed state bank if, upon review of the information required by this chapter, including the following, it approves the application:

certification by an officer by affidavit that the capital and surplus required by the department have been fully paid in cash;

a list of all shareholders, giving the name, address, and number of shares held by each;

bylaws of the corporation;

evidence satisfactory to the department that the bank has complied with all the requirements of this chapter and any conditions imposed by the department and has advised the department in writing of any changes that have occurred in the facts reflected in the material it filed under AS

06.05.344

.

If the rights conferred by a certificate of authority are not exercised within one year from the date of its issuance, the certificate lapses.

Except as authorized under this section, a person may not

engage in the business of receiving deposits, discounting evidences of indebtedness, or receiving money for transmission;

represent that the person is a bank; or

use any form of the word “bank” in the person’s name unless the person is a state bank formed under this title or a bank formed under the authority of another state or an agency of the federal government, or unless it is clear that the use does not represent that the person is a bank; the prohibition in this paragraph does not apply to a food bank, blood bank, or similar organization that cannot readily be confused with a bank.

A person prohibited by (d)(3) of this section from using any form of the word “bank” in its name may apply to the commissioner for authority to use a form of the word “bank” in its name.

History.

(§ 3.211 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 27 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 58 — 60 ch 26 SLA 1993; am §§ 20, 21 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of banks, see 3 AAC 2, art. 3.

Sec. 06.05.355.
Deposit insurance required.

The department may require a state bank, either at the time the bank applies for a certificate of authority or during the bank’s existence, to become a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

A bank that is a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation may not voluntarily relinquish membership without the consent of the department. Request for the consent must be made at least 180 days before the proposed date of relinquishment.

Relinquishment of membership without giving notice and obtaining the department’s consent, involuntary loss of membership, or failure to become a member after the department directs the bank to become a member constitutes cause for the department to take possession of the bank in the manner provided by this chapter.

History.

(§ 3.213 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1970; am § 28 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 61, 62 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.360.
Foreign persons engaged in banking. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.365.
Application for charter. [Repealed, § 54 ch 169 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 06.05.367.
Banks of foreign nationals engaging in a banking business in the state. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Secs. 06.05.370 — 06.05.375.
Charters; subscription calls. [Repealed, § 54 ch 169 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 06.05.380.
Affidavit of capital paid in. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.385.
Organizational meeting; bylaws.

A state bank may not call an organizational meeting under AS

10.06.223

until all capital and surplus have been fully paid.

Bylaws shall be adopted and may be amended by a vote of the holders of a majority of the outstanding voting shares voted at a meeting of the shareholders. If not provided in the articles of incorporation, the bylaws must indicate the organizational structure of the bank and specifically designate the offices that will be held by the executive or managing officers of the bank. The bank shall file with the department copies of the original bylaws of the bank and any amendments adopted for the bylaws.

History.

(§ 3.219 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 63 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of banks, see 3 AAC 2, art. 3.

Secs. 06.05.390,
06.05.395.
Reimbursement of officer, director or employee for expenses in defending suits; certificate of authority required. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.399.
Application for certificate of authority for branch bank or change of location.

Before operating a branch bank at a permanent location or a mobile facility branch bank, or changing the location of the principal office or a branch of the bank at a permanent location, a state bank must apply to the department for a certificate of authority to do so. The application must be in the form and contain the information the department requires to enable the department to determine whether a certificate of authority should be issued, including the address at which the state bank or branch at a permanent location will operate. Investigation expenses incurred by the department in processing applications shall be charged to and paid by the applicant as provided in AS

06.01.010

. At the time of submitting the application to the department, the applicant shall pay to the department $1,000 in partial payment of those investigation expenses incurred by the department. If the investigation expenses incurred by the department do not exceed $1,000, the remainder shall be promptly refunded to the applicant. In this subsection, “mobile facility branch bank” means a branch bank that moves from one location to another to provide banking services and that is located in or serves remote areas of the state not being adequately served by permanently located banks or bank branches.

The department shall notify the state bank of its action on the application for a branch bank or for a change of location. If the application and the accompanying documents do not conform to the requirements of (a) of this section, the department shall return them with an explanation of the defects in them. If the department does not respond within 30 days of its receipt of the application, the application shall be considered to have been accepted.

The state bank shall publish notice of the application for a branch bank or for a change in location in the manner provided in AS

06.05.344(d)

— (e). The notice shall state the proposed location for the facility.

Upon acceptance of an application for a certificate of authority to operate a branch bank or for approval to change location, the department shall conduct an investigation to ascertain whether

the addition of the proposed facility in the community is consistent with a sound and competitive banking system;

the population density and other economic characteristics of the area primarily to be served afford reasonable promise of adequate support for the proposed facility;

the capital structure of the state bank is adequate in relation to the anticipated business and costs of operating at the proposed location;

the name is not deceptively similar to that of another branch or bank and is not otherwise misleading.

Not later than 150 days after the application for a certificate of authority to operate a branch bank or to change location has been accepted, the department shall make a determination whether to approve the application. Within 30 days after the second publication of the notice referred to in (c) of this section, a person opposing the pending application may file written objections with the department. When it approves or denies the application, the department shall notify the bank and any other person who requested in writing to be notified; if the application is denied, the department shall state the reasons for its decision.

The department shall issue a certificate of authority to operate a branch bank or to change location if

all conditions imposed by the department in granting the certificate have been fulfilled; and

the requirements of this chapter are satisfied.

If the rights conferred by a certificate of authority are not exercised within one year from the date of its issuance under this section, the certificate lapses.

History.

(§ 29 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 64 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of banks, see 3 AAC 2, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, made stylistic changes in (e).

Editor's notes. —

Section 8, ch. 56, SLA 1971, provides: “Any branch or limited banking facility operating under a charter from the State of Alaska on January 1, 1971, is a duly chartered branch.”

Secs. 06.05.400 — 06.05.425.
Certificate of authority. [Repealed, § 54 ch 169 SLA 1978. For current law, see AS 06.05.350, 06.05.399, and 06.05.466.]

Sec. 06.05.426.
Automated teller machines.

A state bank may establish, maintain, and operate an automated teller machine on the premises of the main office or a branch office of the bank.

A state bank may establish, maintain, and operate an automated teller machine at a location other than bank premises by notifying the department 30 days before the date of establishment. An automated teller machine operated off bank premises shall be made available on a nondiscriminatory basis for use by depositors of other depository institutions authorized to do business in the state, upon the agreement of the other depository institutions to pay a fair and equitable amount for the use of the machine.

The notice required in (b) of this section must include

the location and general description of the surrounding area, including a description of the business establishment, if any, in which the machine will be located;

the manner of operation and the kinds of transactions that the machine will perform;

the names of the other depository institutions that will share the machine’s services; and

other information required by the department.

A state bank may invest in a corporation organized to operate machines that perform automated teller services for two or more depository institutions.

A person may not establish or operate an automated teller machine that accepts deposits unless those deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or another agency of the United States that insures deposits.

History.

(§ 65 ch 26 SLA 1993; am §§ 22 — 25 ch 75 SLA 2002)